Hawaii statutes.
[Part II.] PEER REVIEW PROCESS

[§466-31] Definitions. As used in this
part, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

"Rating" means the type of report
issued following a peer review. Rating shall be "pass", "pass
with deficiency", or "fail".

"Sponsoring organization" means a
third-party entity that meets the standards specified by this part for
administering a peer review. [L 2012, c 324, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next